Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.261

Butter or cheese—Pasteurization of milk or cream.

All milk or cream used in the manufacture of pasteurized butter or cheese shall be pasteurized only in the plant where the butter or cheese is manufactured.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.32.410. Prior: 1919 c 192 s 12; RRS s 6175. Formerly RCW 15.32.410.]